Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Chapter 3 Administrative Procedure
§ 16-3-112.
Contested cases; presiding officers; qualifications; powers; outside personnel; hearing officers.

If not otherwise authorized by law there shall preside at the taking of evidence in all contested cases the statutory agency, one (1) or more members of the body which comprises the agency, or an employee of the agency or an employee of another agency designated by the agency to act as presiding officer. The functions of all those presiding in contested cases shall be conducted in an impartial manner. Any officer shall at any time withdraw if he deems himself disqualified provided there are other qualified presiding officers available to act.

Officers presiding at hearings shall have authority, subject to the published rules of the agency and within its power to:

Administer oaths and affirmations;

Issue subpoenas;

Rule upon offers of proof and receive relevant evidence;

Take or cause depositions to be taken in accordance with the provisions of this act and the rules of the agency;

Regulate the course of the hearing;

Hold conferences for the settlement or simplification of the issues;

Dispose of procedural requests or similar matters;

Make recommended decisions when directed to do so by the agency; and

Take any other action authorized by agency rules consistent with this act.

In all contested cases to the extent that it is necessary in order to obtain compliance with W.S.

16-3-111

the agency (excepting county and municipal agencies and political subdivisions on the county and local level) may request the office of the attorney general to furnish to the agency such personnel as may be necessary in order for the agency to properly investigate, prepare, present and prosecute the contested case before the agency. The attorney general upon the receipt of the request shall promptly comply with same with no charge being made against the requesting agency’s appropriation other than for travel and per diem expenses.

To the extent an agency utilizes an employee of another agency (other than the staff of the attorney general) to preside at a hearing or otherwise the salary of the employee during the period of the employment and the expenses incurred by the employee shall be charged against the appropriation of the using agency.

When required by law an agency shall adopt rules and regulations providing a procedure for the use and the selection of an administrative hearing officer. An agency shall not delegate the authority to make final decisions to an independent administrative hearing officer unless required by law.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 108, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.30; W.S. 1977, § 9-4-112; Laws 1981, ch. 10, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” see § 16-3-101(b)(xi).

Fair and impartial hearing. —

In a case
seeking the establishment of a private road, a hearing officer did
not violate this section by offering advice in response to questions
and attempting to clarify issues for the consideration of a county
board of commissioners; the hearing officer emphasized that the ultimate
decision was for the board alone to make. There was no indication
of a bias or prejudice that permeated the hearing; moreover, the hearing
officer was balanced in his rulings during the evidentiary hearings
and admitted all exhibits on both sides. Price Family Trust v. Hutchinson, 2014 WY 162, 340 P.3d 1002,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2014).

Embraced by the employee's constitutional and statutory guarantee to a fair hearing in the administrative process is his right to be heard before an unbiased, fair and impartial tribunal. Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976); Ririe v. Board of Trustees, 674 P.2d 214,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 391

(Wyo. 1983).

Suspension of accountant's certificate to practice was proper where substantial evidence showed that accountant participated in audit prior to having approval to do so, and thus he violated a settlement agreement from a prior disciplinary action and engaged in dishonesty in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 33-3-121(a)(ii) when he attempted to legitimize his activity by using other accountants as the signing auditors. Also the accountant's rights to due process and a fair trial under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-3-112(a) of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act were not violated because the accountant failed to overcome the presumption of impartiality of the Board members, or to explain how the hearing examiner's efforts failed to cure any prejudice he suffered as a result of the committee's delay in producing the documents.
Dorr v. Wyoming Bd., 2006 WY 144, 146 P.3d 943,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(2006).

Internal Hearing Unit properly formed. —

The Division of Workers Safety and Compensation was authorized to promulgate rules and regulations relating to the resolution of contested matters that are not required to be heard by the Medical Commission or the Office of Administrative Hearings, including agency review of claimed late filings, and had ample authority to form the Internal Hearing Unit. Internal Hearing Unit. Sheneman v. Division of Workers' Safety & Comp. Internal Hearing Unit, 956 P.2d 344,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1998).

And voir dire inquiry of administrative tribunal permitted. —

Within adequate guidelines, voir dire inquiry should be permitted of an administrative tribunal to ascertain the absence or presence of bias or prejudice of the members. Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976); Ririe v. Board of Trustees, 674 P.2d 214,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 391

(Wyo. 1983).

Interested, nonvoting, commission member may sign determination. —

Where there were three members of the oil and gas conservation commission, other than a member with a financial interest, present at all hearings, which satisfied § 30-5-103(c), and during the session that person never cast a vote, the due process guarantee of impartiality by fact-finding was satisfied. Admittedly, the interested member signed the final determination, but that fact in itself carried no legal consequence, as it occurred as a ministerial act for the entry of the decision made by the actual participants. ANR Prod. Co. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 800 P.2d 492,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1990).

Fair and impartial hearing. —

Pursuant to review under Wyo. R. App. P. 12.09(a) and Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-3-114(c), there was substantial evidence supported a claimant's award of unemployment insurance benefits because irrelevant evidence of an alleged conspiracy was properly excluded under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-3-108(a) and claimant's conduct was determined to be ordinary negligence in an isolated instance and not misconduct under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-3-311(f). Further, the hearing officer complied with Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-3-112(a) to provide the claimant's former employer with a fair and impartial hearing.
Aspen Ridge Law Offices, P.C. v. Wyo. Dep't of Empl., 2006 WY 129, 143 P.3d 911,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2006).

Authority For Internal Hearing Unit. —

Section

13-3-102

and this section, along with §

27-14-802

vested the Division of Workers' Safety and Compensation with authority to form the Internal Hearing Unit comprised of members of the agency. Poll v. State ex rel. Department of Empl., Div. of Workers' Safety & Compensation, 963 P.2d 977,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1998).

Applied

in

Wyoming State Dep't of Educ. v. Barber, 649 P.2d 681,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 374

(Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

State Transp. Comm'n v. Ford, 844 P.2d 496,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 1992); RM v. Department of Family Servs., 953 P.2d 477,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1998); Dorr v. State Bd. of CPAs, 2001 WY 37, 21 P.3d 735,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

For comment on Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976), see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 327 (1977).

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

For article, “A State Central Panel Hearing Officer System for Wyoming,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 497 (1986).

§ 16-3-113.
License hearings.

When the grant, denial, suspension or renewal of a license is required by law to be preceded by notice and an opportunity for hearing the provisions of this act concerning contested cases apply.

When a licensee has made timely and sufficient application for the renewal of a license or a new license with reference to any activity of a continuing nature, the existing license does not expire until the application has been finally determined by the agency, and, in case the application is denied or the terms of the new license limited, until the last day for seeking review of the agency order or a later date fixed by order of the reviewing court.

No revocation, suspension, annulment or withdrawal of any license is lawful unless, prior to the institution of agency proceedings, the agency gave notice by mail to the licensee of facts or conduct which warrant the intended action, and the licensee was given an opportunity to show compliance with all lawful requirements for the retention of the license. If the agency finds that public health, safety or welfare imperatively requires emergency action, and incorporates a finding to that effect in its order, summary suspension of a license may be ordered pending proceedings for revocation or other action. A cancellation of a driver’s license pursuant to W.S. 31-7-121(c) [repealed] shall not be valid until the department of transportation gives notice by mail to the licensee of the facts which warrant the intended action and provides the licensee with an opportunity to provide additional evidence or information with respect to the condition at issue within fifteen (15) days of the mailing of the notice. These proceedings shall be promptly instituted and determined.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 108, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.31; W.S. 1977, § 9-4-113; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1993, ch. 46, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 16-3-101(b)(xi).

Scope of subsection (a). —

Subsection (a) deals with licensing matters where action is required by law to be preceded by notice and an opportunity for a hearing (as in a contested case). Thornley v. Wyoming Highway Dep't, Motor Vehicle Div., 478 P.2d 600,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1971).

Driver's license suspension proceedings were “instituted”

when the department of revenue forwarded a motorist's request for a hearing to a independent hearing examiner, and not when the officer who arrested her for driving under the influence furnished her with a notice of suspension and a temporary driver's license. Gerstell v. State, 769 P.2d 389,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1989).

Procedures for approving new health-care institutions. —

Notice and public meeting requirements of the certificate-of-need review process under the New Institutional Health Services Act comprise a “contested case” within the meaning of this chapter. In re Application for Certificate of Need by HCA Health Serv., 689 P.2d 108,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 340

(Wyo. 1984).

Notice and hearing afforded. —

Licensee afforded notice and an opportunity to be heard. Roush v. Pari-Mutuel Comm'n, 917 P.2d 1133,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1996).

Burden of proof. —

Once professional guide established the qualifications for licensure, the burden of proof should have shifted to the board of outfitters and professional guides (board), to go forward with its evidence justifying the denial of guide's license, though the guide had the burden of persuading the board that its grounds for denial were insufficient under the governing statutes and regulations. State Bd. of Outfitters & Prof'l Guides v. Clark, 2001 WY 78, 30 P.3d 36,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 2001).

Applied

in

Naibauer v. Board of Platte County Comm'rs, 895 P.2d 445,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Department of Revenue & Taxation v. Shipley, 579 P.2d 415,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 294

(Wyo. 1978); Ballard v. Wyoming Pari-Mutuel Comm'n, 750 P.2d 286,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1988).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

§ 16-3-114.
Judicial review of agency actions; district courts.

Subject to the requirement that administrative remedies be exhausted and in the absence of any statutory or common-law provision precluding or limiting judicial review, any person aggrieved or adversely affected in fact by a final decision of an agency in a contested case, or by other agency action or inaction, or any person affected in fact by a rule adopted by an agency, is entitled to judicial review in the district court for the county in which the injury or harm for which relief is sought occurred, in the district court for the county in which the administrative action or inaction was taken, or in which any real property affected by the administrative action or inaction is located, or if no real property is involved, in the district court for the county in which the party aggrieved or adversely affected by the administrative action or inaction resides or has its principal place of business. The procedure to be followed in the proceeding before the district court shall be in accordance with rules heretofore or hereinafter adopted by the Wyoming supreme court.

The supreme court’s authority to adopt rules governing review from agencies to the district courts shall include authority to determine the content of the record upon review, the pleadings to be filed, the time and manner for filing the pleadings, records and other documents and the extent to which supplemental testimony and evidence may be taken or considered by the district court. The rules adopted by the supreme court under this provision may supersede existing statutory provisions.

To the extent necessary to make a decision and when presented, the reviewing court shall decide all relevant questions of law, interpret constitutional and statutory provisions, and determine the meaning or applicability of the terms of an agency action. In making the following determinations, the court shall review the whole record or those parts of it cited by a party and due account shall be taken of the rule of prejudicial error. The reviewing court shall:

Compel agency action unlawfully withheld or unreasonably delayed; and

Hold unlawful and set aside agency action, findings and conclusions found to be:

Arbitrary, capricious, an abuse of discretion or otherwise not in accordance with law;

Contrary to constitutional right, power, privilege or immunity;

In excess of statutory jurisdiction, authority or limitations or lacking statutory right;

Without observance of procedure required by law; or

Unsupported by substantial evidence in a case reviewed on the record of an agency hearing provided by statute.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 108, § 14; W. S. 1957, § 9-276.32; Laws 1973, ch. 24, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-4-114; Laws 1979, ch. 58, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2021 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

For rule governing judicial review of administrative actions, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added "in the district court for the county in which the injury or harm for which relief is sought occurred," in the first sentence of (a).

I. General Consideration.

II. Rules of Appellate Procedure.

III. Availability of Review.

A. Persons.

B. Issues.

IV. Scope of Review.

A. In General.

B. Substantial Evidence.

C. Illustrative Cases.

§ 16-3-115.
Judicial review of agency actions; supreme court.

An aggrieved party may obtain a review of any final judgment of the district court under this act by appeal to the supreme court. The appeal shall be taken as in other civil cases.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 108, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.33; W.S. 1977, § 9-4-115; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

For rule governing judicial review of administrative actions, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 16-3-101(b)(xi).

Repealing and savings clauses. —

Section 17, ch. 108, Laws 1965, reads: “All acts or parts of acts which are inconsistent with the provisions of this act are hereby repealed, but this repeal does not affect pending proceedings. Provided, however, to the extent not inconsistent herewith existing procedures provided for by statute shall be deemed preserved and the procedures provided for by this act shall be in addition and supplementary thereto.”

Severability. —

Section 16, ch. 108, Laws 1965, reads: “If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this act are severable.”

Agency adversely affected by the decision of a district court is “aggrieved”

and is entitled to appeal to the supreme court. Safety Medical Servs. v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 724 P.2d 468,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 609

(Wyo. 1986).

Issues not raised at the hearing before the agency will not be considered

for the first time on appeal. In re State Bank Charter Application of Sec. Bank, 606 P.2d 296,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1980).

Courts have always been quite liberal with respect to the matter of pleadings

in proceedings before administrative agencies. Glenn v. Board of County Comm'rs, 440 P.2d 1,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1968).

Supreme court review as if appeal directly from agency. —

The supreme court will review an agency action as though the appeal were directly to the court from the agency, and the court will be governed by the same rules of review as is the district court. Atchison v. Career Serv. Council, 664 P.2d 18,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 319

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 982, 104 S. Ct. 424, 78 L. Ed. 2d 359, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 2367 (U.S. 1983).

And supreme court will not substitute its judgment on matters of discretion

for that of the administrative agency, nor will the court perform duties assigned by law to administrative boards. Atchison v. Career Serv. Council, 664 P.2d 18,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 319

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 982, 104 S. Ct. 424, 78 L. Ed. 2d 359, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 2367 (U.S. 1983).

Decisions of parole board not reviewable. —

The obvious purpose of § 7-13-402(f) is to completely foreclose judicial review of the proceedings and decisions of the Wyoming board of parole under this article, including the limited review authorized in Pisano v. Shillinger, 835 P.2d 1136,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1992).Hamill v. Ferguson, 937 F. Supp. 1517, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17115 (D. Wyo. 1996).

Applied

in

C F & I Steel Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 492 P.2d 529,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1972); Hillard v. Big Horn Coal Co., 549 P.2d 293,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1976); Allied Fid. Ins. Co. v. Environmental Quality Council, 753 P.2d 1038,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1988); Taylor v. Wyoming Bd. of Medicine, 930 P.2d 973,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1996).

Quoted

in

Snell v. Ruppert, 541 P.2d 1042,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1975); McCulloch Gas Transmission Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 627 P.2d 173,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 330

(Wyo. 1981); Barcon, Inc. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 845 P.2d 373,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1992).

Stated

in

Town of Evansville Police Dep't v. Porter, 2011 WY 86, 256 P.3d 476,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(June 1, 2011).

Cited

in

In re Assessment of State Bd. of Equalization, 457 P.2d 963,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1969); Scarlett v. Town Council, 463 P.2d 26,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1969); Rolfes v. State ex rel. Burt, 464 P.2d 531 (Wyo. 1970); Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. Pioneer Canal Co., 464 P.2d 533,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1970); King v. White, 499 P.2d 585,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1972); Brenning v. State, 870 P.2d 349,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1994); RM v. Department of Family Servs., 953 P.2d 477,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1998); Velasquez v. Chamberlain, 2009 WY 80, 209 P.3d 888,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(June 18, 2009).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).